Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1906.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3(e) and 4(d) and (d.1) of the act of September 30, 1983 (P.L.160, No.39), known as the Public Official Compensation Law, are amended to read:Section 3. Compensation of Governor and Lieutenant Governor; State Treasurer; Auditor General; Attorney General; Commissioners of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission; and heads of departments.* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 (e) Annual cost-of-living adjustment.--(1) Except as provided under [paragraph (2)] paragraphs (2) and (3), beginning January 1, 1997, and each January 1 thereafter, the stated annual salaries of the Governor and Lieutenant Governor, the State Treasurer, the Auditor General, the Attorney General and the heads of the departments and members of boards and commissions denoted herein shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living increase calculated by applying the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area, for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current salary amounts authorized. The percentage increase and the salary amounts shall be determined by the Governor prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall be published by the Secretary of the Budget in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within ten days of the date the determination is made.(2) The stated annual salaries of the Governor and Lieutenant Governor, the State Treasurer, the Auditor General, the Attorney General and the heads of the departments and members of boards and commissions may not be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment under paragraph (1) for the annual period beginning January 1, 2021, and ending December 31, 2021. Notice of the provisions of this subsection shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin 20250HB1906PN2383 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prior to December 1, 2020.(3) The stated annual salaries of the Governor and Lieutenant Governor may not be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment under paragraph (1) for any annual period in which a general appropriation act has not been enacted into law prior to July 1 of the prior year. Notice of the provisions of this subsection shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin prior to December 1 of each year in which no general appropriation act has been enacted into law by July 1.Section 4. Members of the General Assembly.* * *(d) Subsequent annual cost-of-living adjustment for members.--(1) Except as provided under [paragraph (2)] paragraphs (2) and (3), for the 12-month period beginning December 1, 1997, through November 30, 1998, and for each like 12-month period thereafter, the salary of the members of the General Assembly shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by applying the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area, for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current salary amounts. The percentage increase and the new salary amounts shall be determined jointly by the Chief Clerk of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives prior to 20250HB1906PN2383 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall be published by them in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within ten days of the date such determination is made.(2) The salary of the members of the General Assembly may not be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment under paragraph (1) for the period beginning December 1, 2020, through November 30, 2021. Notice of the provisions of this subsection shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin prior to December 1, 2020.(3) The salary of the members of the General Assembly may not be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment under paragraph (1) for any annual period in which a general appropriation act has not been enacted into law prior to July 1 of the prior year. Notice of the provisions of this subsection shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin prior to December 1 of each year in which no general appropriation act has been enacted into law by July 1.(d.1) Subsequent annual cost-of-living adjustment for officers and leaders.--(1) Except as provided under [paragraph (2)] paragraphs (2) and (3), for the 12-month period beginning December 1, 1997, through November 30, 1998, and for each like 12-month period thereafter, the additional compensation of the officers and leaders of the General Assembly shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by applying the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New 20250HB1906PN2383 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area, for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, to the then current compensation. The percentage increase and the new compensation amounts shall be determined jointly by the Chief Clerk of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives prior to the annual effective date of the adjustment and shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 20 days immediately prior to each cost-of-living increase taking effect.(2) The additional compensation of the officers and leaders of the General Assembly may not be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment under paragraph (1) for the period beginning December 1, 2020, through November 30, 2021. Notice of the provisions of this subsection shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin prior to December 1, 2020.(3) The additional compensation of the officers and leaders of the General Assembly may not be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment under paragraph (1) for any annual period in which a general appropriation act has not been enacted into law prior to July 1 of the prior year. Notice of the provisions of this subsection shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin prior to December 1 of each year in which no general appropriation act has been enacted into law by July 1.20250HB1906PN2383 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1906PN2383 - 6 - 1